Utah statutes.
10-6-151.   Independent audit requirements.

Independent audits of all cities are required to be performed in conformity with Title 51, Chapter 2a, Accounting Reports from Political Subdivisions, Interlocal Organizations, and Other Local Entities Act.



Amended by Chapter 19, 2008 General Session

